test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-Clex_vuonjas_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - vuonjâš: # 
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Nom: vuonjâš
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Gen: vuonnjâš
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Acc: vuonnjâš
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Ill: [vuoˊnjâšân, vuoˊnjâčân] 
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Loc: [vuoˊnjâšist, vuoˊnjâčist]
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Com: [vuoˊnjâšáin, vuoˊnjâčáin]
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Abe: vuonnjâšttáá
    vuonjâš+N+Ess: vuoˊnjâččin
    vuonjâš+N+Par: vuoˊnjâččid
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Nom: [vuoˊnjâšeh, vuoˊnjâčeh]
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Gen: [vuoˊnjâšij, vuoˊnjâčij]
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Acc: [vuoˊnjâšijd, vuoˊnjâčijd] 
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Ill: [vuoˊnjâšáid, vuoˊnjâčáid]
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Loc: [vuoˊnjâšijn, vuoˊnjâčijn]
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Com: [vuoˊnjâšijguin, vuoˊnjâčijguin]
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Abe: [vuoˊnjâšijttáá, vuoˊnjâčijttáá]
